test/src/morphology/N-hobune_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - hobune: # Noun 'horse' - full paradigm
     # according to Eesti keele käsiraamat
     # http://www.eki.ee/books/ekk09/
     # -----------------------------------------
     #
     # Singular
     #
     hobune+S+sg+nom: hobune
     hobune+S+sg+gen: hobuse
     hobune+S+sg+part: hobust
     hobune+S+sg+ill: hobusesse
     hobune+S+sg+in: hobuses
     hobune+S+sg+el: hobusest
     hobune+S+sg+all: hobusele
     hobune+S+sg+ad: hobusel
     hobune+S+sg+abl: hobuselt
     hobune+S+sg+tr: hobuseks
     hobune+S+sg+term: hobuseni
     hobune+S+sg+es: hobusena
     hobune+S+sg+abes: hobuseta
     hobune+S+sg+kom: hobusega
     #
     # Plural
     #
     hobune+S+pl+nom: hobused
     hobune+S+pl+gen: hobuste
     hobune+S+pl+part: hobuseid
     hobune+S+pl+ill: hobustesse
     hobune+S+pl+in: hobustes
     hobune+S+pl+el: hobustest
     hobune+S+pl+all: hobustele
     hobune+S+pl+ad: hobustel
     hobune+S+pl+abl: hobustelt
     hobune+S+pl+tr: hobusteks
     hobune+S+pl+term: hobusteni
     hobune+S+pl+es: hobustena
     hobune+S+pl+abes: hobusteta
     hobune+S+pl+kom: hobustega   
